Tennessee, session 114, HB0936.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-3-501(12), is amended by
deleting the language "siblings of the whole or half-blood, step-siblings, nieces, nephews" and
substituting instead "siblings of the whole or half-blood, step-siblings, nieces or nephews of the
whole or half-blood,".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0936
001073
- 1 -